third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.aff
FLAG num
SFX 541 N 3
SFX 541 0 манде .
SFX 541 0 мандеро .
SFX 541 0 мандест .

SFX 542 N 3
SFX 542 0 мандиҳо .
SFX 542 0 мандиҳои .
SFX 542 0 мандиҳояш .

SFX 543 N 1
SFX 543 0 мандиҳое .

SFX 544 N 2
SFX 544 0 мандие .
SFX 544 0 мандиеро .

SFX 545 N 1
SFX 545 0 мандо .

SFX 546 N 14
SFX 546 0 мандон .
SFX 546 0 мандонам .
SFX 546 0 мандонамон .
SFX 546 0 мандонамонро .
SFX 546 0 мандонанд .
SFX 546 0 мандонатон .
SFX 546 0 мандонаш .
SFX 546 0 мандонашон .
SFX 546 0 мандонашонро .
SFX 546 0 мандонашро .
SFX 546 0 мандонед .
SFX 546 0 мандони .
SFX 546 0 мандонро .
SFX 546 0 мандону .

SFX 547 N 4
SFX 547 0 мандона .
SFX 547 0 мандонаи .
SFX 547 0 мандонаро .
SFX 547 0 мандонаю .

SFX 548 N 1
SFX 548 0 мандонае .

SFX 549 N 2
SFX 549 0 мандоне .
SFX 549 0 мандонеро .

SFX 550 N 3
SFX 550 0 мандтар .
SFX 550 0 мандтаранд .
SFX 550 0 мандтарашон .

SFX 551 N 2
SFX 551 0 мандтарин .
SFX 551 0 мандтарини .

SFX 552 N 7
SFX 552 0 монанд .
SFX 552 0 монандат .
SFX 552 0 монандаш .
SFX 552 0 монандашро .
SFX 552 0 монанди .
SFX 552 0 монандро .
SFX 552 0 монанду .

SFX 553 N 1
SFX 553 0 монандҳо .

SFX 554 N 2
SFX 554 0 монанде .
SFX 554 0 монандест .

SFX 555 N 4
SFX 555 0 навард .
SFX 555 0 наварди .
SFX 555 0 навардро .
SFX 555 0 наварду .

SFX 556 N 2
SFX 556 0 навардӣ .
SFX 556 0 навардии .

SFX 557 N 2
SFX 557 0 наварде .
SFX 557 0 навардест .

SFX 558 N 1
SFX 558 0 навардиҳо .

SFX 559 N 3
SFX 559 0 навардон .
SFX 559 0 навардони .
SFX 559 0 навардону .

SFX 560 N 3
SFX 560 0 нгӣ .
SFX 560 0 нгиро .
SFX 560 0 нгию .

SFX 561 N 2
SFX 561 0 нгар .
SFX 561 0 нгари .

SFX 562 N 1
SFX 562 0 нгаре .

SFX 563 N 3
SFX 563 0 нгарон .
SFX 563 0 нгаронамон .
SFX 563 0 нгарони .

SFX 565 N 3
SFX 565 0 нда .
SFX 565 0 ндаву .
SFX 565 0 ндаро .

SFX 566 N 3
SFX 566 0 но .
SFX 566 0 нову .
SFX 566 0 нои .

SFX 567 N 1
SFX 567 0 ноҳо .

SFX 568 N 2
SFX 568 0 ное .
SFX 568 0 ноест .

SFX 569 N 10
SFX 569 0 нок .
SFX 569 0 нокам .
SFX 569 0 нокамро .
SFX 569 0 ноканд .
SFX 569 0 нокат .
SFX 569 0 нокаш .
SFX 569 0 нокашу .
SFX 569 0 ноки .
SFX 569 0 нокро .
SFX 569 0 ноку .

SFX 570 N 2
SFX 570 0 нокҳо .
SFX 570 0 нокҳои .

SFX 571 N 10
SFX 571 0 нокӣ .
SFX 571 0 нокиаш .
SFX 571 0 нокиашон .
SFX 571 0 нокиашонро .
SFX 571 0 нокиашро .
SFX 571 0 нокиву .
SFX 571 0 нокии .
SFX 571 0 нокиро .
SFX 571 0 нокию .
SFX 571 0 нокияш .

SFX 572 N 3
SFX 572 0 ноке .
SFX 572 0 нокеро .
SFX 572 0 нокест .

SFX 573 N 1
SFX 573 0 нокиҳои .

SFX 574 N 1
SFX 574 0 нокон .

SFX 575 N 1
SFX 575 0 нокона .

SFX 576 N 1
SFX 576 0 ноконаи .

SFX 577 N 4
SFX 577 0 ноктар .
SFX 577 0 ноктаранд .
SFX 577 0 ноктари .
SFX 577 0 ноктарро .

SFX 578 N 2
SFX 578 0 ноктарин .
SFX 578 0 ноктарини .

SFX 579 N 1
SFX 579 0 ноктаринеро .

SFX 580 N 16
SFX 580 0 о .
SFX 580 0 оашонро .
SFX 580 0 ову .
SFX 580 0 оед .
SFX 580 0 оем .
SFX 580 0 ои .
SFX 580 0 оро .
SFX 580 0 ост .
SFX 580 0 осту .
SFX 580 0 ою .
SFX 580 0 ояд .
SFX 580 0 оям .
SFX 580 0 ояму .
SFX 580 0 оянд .
SFX 580 0 оянди .
SFX 580 0 ояш .

SFX 581 N 12
SFX 581 0 оӣ .
SFX 581 0 оиаш .
SFX 581 0 оиашро .
SFX 581 0 оиву .
SFX 581 0 оии .
SFX 581 0 оиро .
SFX 581 0 оист .
SFX 581 0 оию .
SFX 581 0 оиям .
SFX 581 0 оиямон .
SFX 581 0 оияш .
SFX 581 0 оияшро .

SFX 582 N 3
SFX 582 0 обон .
SFX 582 0 обони .
SFX 582 0 обону .

SFX 583 N 2
SFX 583 0 обонӣ .
SFX 583 0 обонии .

SFX 584 N 6
SFX 584 0 ов .
SFX 584 0 ованд .
SFX 584 0 оваш .
SFX 584 0 ови .
SFX 584 0 овро .
SFX 584 0 ову .

SFX 585 N 3
SFX 585 0 овҳо .
SFX 585 0 овҳоро .
SFX 585 0 овҳост .

SFX 586 N 4
SFX 586 0 ова .
SFX 586 0 оваи .
SFX 586 0 оваро .
SFX 586 0 оваю .

SFX 587 N 2
SFX 587 0 оваҳо .
SFX 587 0 оваҳоро .

SFX 588 N 4
SFX 588 0 ованд .
SFX 588 0 овандамон .
SFX 588 0 овандаш .
SFX 588 0 ованди .

SFX 589 N 4
SFX 589 0 овандӣ .
SFX 589 0 овандии .
SFX 589 0 овандиро .
SFX 589 0 овандиятонро .

SFX 590 N 1
SFX 590 0 ованде .

SFX 591 N 1
SFX 591 0 овандиҳои .

SFX 592 N 1
SFX 592 0 овандие .

SFX 593 N 11
SFX 593 0 овандон .
SFX 593 0 овандонам .
SFX 593 0 овандонамон .
SFX 593 0 овандонамонро .
SFX 593 0 овандонатон .
SFX 593 0 овандонатону .
SFX 593 0 овандонаш .
SFX 593 0 овандонашон .
SFX 593 0 овандони .
SFX 593 0 овандонро .
SFX 593 0 овандону .

SFX 594 N 1
SFX 594 0 овандоне .

SFX 595 N 1
SFX 595 0 ове .

SFX 596 N 1
SFX 596 0 овиён .

SFX 597 N 3
SFX 597 0 ович .
SFX 597 0 овичи .
SFX 597 0 овичро .

SFX 598 N 2
SFX 598 0 овна .
SFX 598 0 овнаи .

SFX 599 N 1
SFX 599 0 овчӣ .

SFX 600 N 2
SFX 600 0 огиашро .
SFX 600 0 огии .

SFX 601 N 6
SFX 601 0 огин .
SFX 601 0 огинам .
SFX 601 0 огинат .
SFX 601 0 огини .
SFX 601 0 огинро .
SFX 601 0 огину .

SFX 602 N 2
SFX 602 0 ое .
SFX 602 0 оест .

SFX 603 N 1
SFX 603 0 оён .

SFX 604 N 1
SFX 604 0 оиҳои .

SFX 605 N 1
SFX 605 0 оидан .

SFX 606 N 1
SFX 606 0 оие .

SFX 607 N 7
SFX 607 0 оиш .
SFX 607 0 оишам .
SFX 607 0 оишаш .
SFX 607 0 оишашон .
SFX 607 0 оиши .
SFX 607 0 оишро .
SFX 607 0 оишу .

SFX 608 N 1
SFX 608 0 оишии .

SFX 609 N 2
SFX 609 0 оише .
SFX 609 0 оишест .

SFX 610 N 5
SFX 610 0 ок .
SFX 610 0 окаш .
SFX 610 0 окашонро .
SFX 610 0 оки .
SFX 610 0 оку .

SFX 611 N 1
SFX 611 0 окҳои .

SFX 612 N 5
SFX 612 0 окӣ .
SFX 612 0 окиву .
SFX 612 0 окии .
SFX 612 0 окиро .
SFX 612 0 окист .

SFX 613 N 3
SFX 613 0 ока .
SFX 613 0 окаашро .
SFX 613 0 окаи .

SFX 614 N 1
SFX 614 0 окае .

SFX 615 N 1
SFX 615 0 окворӣ .

SFX 616 N 4
SFX 616 0 окиҳо .
SFX 616 0 окиҳои .
SFX 616 0 окиҳоро .
SFX 616 0 окиҳояшонро .

SFX 617 N 1
SFX 617 0 окиҳое .

SFX 618 N 1
SFX 618 0 окие .

SFX 619 N 4
SFX 619 0 ол .
SFX 619 0 олаш .
SFX 619 0 оли .
SFX 619 0 олу .

SFX 620 N 1
SFX 620 0 олҳои .

SFX 621 N 1
SFX 621 0 олӣ .

SFX 622 N 1
SFX 622 0 ола .

SFX 623 N 1
SFX 623 0 олак .

SFX 625 N 2
SFX 625 0 онҳо .
SFX 625 0 онҳои .

SFX 627 N 17
SFX 627 0 она .
SFX 627 0 онаам .
SFX 627 0 онаамро .
SFX 627 0 онаанд .
SFX 627 0 онааст .
SFX 627 0 онаат .
SFX 627 0 онаатон .
SFX 627 0 онаатонро .
SFX 627 0 онааш .
SFX 627 0 онаашон .
SFX 627 0 онаашонро .
SFX 627 0 онаашро .
SFX 627 0 онаву .
SFX 627 0 онаем .
SFX 627 0 онаи .
SFX 627 0 онаро .
SFX 627 0 онаю .

SFX 628 N 2
SFX 628 0 онаҳо .
SFX 628 0 онаҳои .

SFX 629 N 3
SFX 629 0 онавор .
SFX 629 0 онавори .
SFX 629 0 онавору .

SFX 630 N 7
SFX 630 0 онагӣ .
SFX 630 0 онагиаш .
SFX 630 0 онагиву .
SFX 630 0 онагии .
SFX 630 0 онагиро .
SFX 630 0 онагист .
SFX 630 0 онагию .

SFX 631 N 2
SFX 631 0 онагиҳо .
SFX 631 0 онагиҳои .

SFX 632 N 1
SFX 632 0 онагие .

SFX 633 N 4
SFX 633 0 онае .
SFX 633 0 онаеро .
SFX 633 0 онаест .
SFX 633 0 онаесту .

SFX 634 N 3
SFX 634 0 онак .
SFX 634 0 онаки .
SFX 634 0 онакро .

SFX 635 N 1
SFX 635 0 онакҳо .

SFX 636 N 3
SFX 636 0 онанда .
SFX 636 0 онандаи .
SFX 636 0 онандаро .

SFX 637 N 2
SFX 637 0 онандагӣ .
SFX 637 0 онандагии .

SFX 638 N 1
SFX 638 0 онандагони .

SFX 639 N 1
SFX 639 0 онандае .

SFX 640 N 1
SFX 640 0 онатар .

SFX 641 N 1
SFX 641 0 онатар  .

SFX 642 N 1
SFX 642 0 онатарин .

SFX 643 N 2
SFX 643 0 онгаҳ .
SFX 643 0 онгаҳи .

SFX 644 N 3
SFX 644 0 онгоҳ .
SFX 644 0 онгоҳи .
SFX 644 0 онгоҳу .

SFX 645 N 1
SFX 645 0 онгоҳҳои .

SFX 646 N 1
SFX 646 0 онгоҳии .

SFX 647 N 1
SFX 647 0 онгоҳе .

SFX 648 N 1
SFX 648 0 онгоҳон .

SFX 649 N 12
SFX 649 0 онд .
SFX 649 0 ондам .
SFX 649 0 ондаму .
SFX 649 0 онданд .
SFX 649 0 онданду .
SFX 649 0 ондаст .
SFX 649 0 ондаш .
SFX 649 0 ондашу .
SFX 649 0 ондед .
SFX 649 0 ондем .
SFX 649 0 онди .
SFX 649 0 онду .

SFX 650 N 2
SFX 650 0 ондӣ .
SFX 650 0 ондиву .

SFX 651 N 12
SFX 651 0 онда .
SFX 651 0 ондаам .
SFX 651 0 ондаамон .
SFX 651 0 ондаанд .
SFX 651 0 ондааст .
SFX 651 0 ондаашро .
SFX 651 0 ондаву .
SFX 651 0 ондаед .
SFX 651 0 ондаем .
SFX 651 0 ондаи .
SFX 651 0 ондаро .
SFX 651 0 ондаю .

SFX 652 N 1
SFX 652 0 ондаҳо .

SFX 653 N 1
SFX 653 0 ондаӣ .

SFX 654 N 3
SFX 654 0 ондагӣ .
SFX 654 0 ондагиву .
SFX 654 0 ондагиро .
