third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.dic
қонун/25,852,2,94,229,29,859,862,853,855,464,863,856,540,541,539,542,543,14,15
афзалият/25,29,859,569,571,572,579,578,15
барӯ/25,539,540,541,24
бахш/25,852,1,2,4,104,109,112,121,122,842,6,7,254,29,10,11,859,366,368,369,370,371,374,382,384,409,855,474,475,489,496,502,862,580,605,607,609,636,655,718,719,14,15
бесар/852,64,4,5,166,163,29,344,582,583,31,14,15
бози/25,7,8,9,229,232,233,237,254,255,29,859,561,562,563,14,846,860,787,789,793,796,797,16,18,20
гиря/25,2,5,7,8,163,9,859,539,565,14,846,16
дароз/852,64,2,3,4,5,7,8,29,859,862,853,855,863,566,568,580,581,14,742,752,15
ёр/25,852,2,64,75,4,5,6,7,8,163,29,10,11,859,539,540,542,544,552,584,586,31,627,14,15
жарф/852,858,29,859,855,863,568,566,580,742,15
зан/25,33,852,1,64,65,67,70,2,839,857,4,104,112,842,5,6,7,29,10,11,859,853,855,474,863,552,580,31,627,630,633,649,651,655,663,669,14,15
зараррас/369,31,625,636,637,638
иштиёқ/852,2,859,539,546,547,569,15
кайҳон/25,852,859,855,853,555,556,557,559,14
камшунав/859,580,603
кура/25,155,9,859,552,560,14,787
лаҳ/580
лиққ/35,369,382,634,655
маданият/25,3,7,8,29,859,569,571,576,14,15
маст/25,852,64,2,4,5,7,8,195,29,10,11,859,344,853,360,855,862,856,863,31,627,633,14,15
моҳир/35,4,8,29,10,859,580,627,640,14,742,15
муғриз/627,633,31
муфид/4,6,8,29,859,571,14,742,752,15
муш/25,35,64,65,66,195,29,859,453,553,580,31,627,14,15,787,796
нӯш/25,852,1,2,4,104,112,5,7,29,10,11,12,859,366,369,374,382,384,385,386,387,474,862,580,612,613,616,617,618,31,649,651,655,661,663,669,14,15
нам/852,64,75,5,7,29,859,862,853,360,855,569,571,573,580,14,15
намешин/1,2,4,651,661
нафаҳм/852,1,2,4,10,11,344,366,368,369,374,382,31,649,650,651,663
нахусткайҳон/559
нерӯ/25,9,254,255,29,859,539,540,541,544,550,551,14,16,18,22,23,24
ниёз/25,852,2,5,7,29,859,855,853,539,540,541,542,546,547,550,584,586,597,14,15,777
нур/25,33,852,2,94,4,5,6,7,8,147,150,152,163,195,29,11,859,346,409,855,853,453,862,524,580,584,586,601,31,627,672,675,14,15,775,781
одил/33,29,859,855,584,586,627,641,31,14,742,752,15,777
пазир/852,35,1,64,2,4,104,7,10,474,475,580,581,600,602,607,703,15
пурғунҷ/607,608
рашид/852,859,855,853,584,586,596,14
рутубат/25,7,8,29,859,569,14,15
саҳро/25,852,9,29,859,344,853,862,409,855,863,555,558,559,14,846,16,20,21,23
сабукгард/31,636
савод/2,857,4,7,8,29,859,569,570,571,575,699,14,15
садо/25,9,29,859,855,853,569,570,571,14,846,16,18,21,22,23,24
самад/33,859,856,584,585,586,597,598,599,14
самара/25,7,9,29,859,569,571,572,577,578
самим/852,859,853,862,402,855,463,464,856,627,642
саттор/852,859,584,586,595,597,598,15
содир/33,859,597,14,15,777
суд/25,852,35,1,64,2,839,94,4,123,97,5,7,8,29,11,859,862,853,402,855,539,541,540,545,550,551,14,15
суръат/25,7,29,859,569,572,571,14,15
танг/25,852,64,2,5,7,147,29,11,859,853,855,862,566,567,568,14,742,759,15
таппа/552
тоҳир/33,852,859,344,409,855,421,853,862,584,586,597,598,14,15
умар/33,64,29,859,584,586,597,598,14,15
фазо/25,852,9,223,29,859,382,366,853,474,555,559,14,16,17,18,20,21,23
фарасрон/852,636,637
фаъол/3,4,7,8,29,859,855,856,569,571,577,31,627,640,669,14,742,752,755,15
фурӯғ/852,7,29,859,539,601,14
фурӯз/852,1,2,104,109,115,4,426,474,31,634,635,636,650,655,669,679
хабир/585,15
хас/25,852,64,68,2,4,29,11,859,409,421,426,580,605,31,14,15
хаткаш/64,104,369,31,625
хеш/25,852,2,3,4,5,7,8,29,11,859,853,360,402,855,862,580,588,589,590,591,592,593,594,31,627,14,742,15
хирад/2,5,7,8,859,539,540,541,546,547,549,14,15
хол/25,2,857,4,5,7,29,859,421,853,580,584,585,586,587,598,14,15,787,803
хушк/852,1,2,3,7,8,29,859,344,862,853,366,369,382,402,855,453,580,31,649,651,655,663,667,669,14,726,730,732,742,15
хушхӯр/64,859,610,742,15
чанг/25,852,2,5,7,8,29,859,855,862,552,569,619,620,621,622,623,31,696,14,15,787
шаб/25,852,64,68,75,2,857,98,5,6,7,8,224,227,254,291,29,859,426,453,555,580,31,627,643,644,645,647,646,648,14,759,762,15,787
шавқ/25,2,857,5,7,29,859,539,540,542,546,547,550,569,14,15
шакар/25,64,5,7,147,175,177,195,291,302,29,337,859,855,421,436,453,552,554,14,15,777
шарофат/25,33,140,29,859,855,539,541,540,546,547,548,571,14,15,777
шах/25,852,64,29,859,555,557,14,15,787
шин/852,1,64,2,104,4,10,11,31,636,649,650,651,654,655,661,663,669,15
шуҷоат/7,8,859,539,540,547,546,569,14,15
